North Carolina, session 2025, HB122.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 44.
"Integrative Therapies.
"Part 1. North Carolina Board of Integrative Therapies.
"§ 90-750.1. Title and purpose.
(a) This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina Integrative
Therapies Act."
(b) The North Carolina Integrative Therapies Act is established to safeguard the public
health, safety, and welfare; to protect the public from being harmed by unqualified persons; to
assure the highest degree of professional services and conduct on the part of practitioners of the
integrative therapies; to provide for the establishment of licensure requirements; and to ensure
the availability of integrative therapies services of high quality to persons in need of such
services.
"§ 90-750.2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Advisory committee. – A committee charged with supervising the day-to-day
regulation of an integrative therapy profession. Advisory committees shall
screen applicants for licensure and conduct all investigations necessary to give
recommendations to the Board.
(2) Board. – The North Carolina Board of Integrative Therapies, as established
pursuant to G.S. 90-750.3.
(3) Integrative therapies. – The use of allopathic, complementary, or integrative
approaches to the art and science of medicine for the prevention,
identification, and treatment of human physical or mental conditions, diseases,
ailments, illnesses, infirmities, pain, defects, or injuries and the promotion and
restoration of health and wellness.
(4) Integrative therapies profession. – Any of the professions listed in
G.S. 90-750.8.
(5) North Carolina Integrative Therapies License. – A license in an integrative
therapy profession issued pursuant to this Article.
*H122-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 90-750.3. North Carolina Board of Integrative Therapies; composition; terms;
compensation.
(a) Establishment. – The North Carolina Board of Integrative Therapies is hereby created.
The Board shall consist of the following members appointed to three-year terms as follows:
(1) One art therapist appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(2) One music therapist appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(3) One art therapist appointed by the Governor.
(4) One music therapist appointed by the Governor.
(5) Two physicians licensed under Article 1 of this Chapter who have experience
with integrative therapies appointed by the Governor.
(6) One member of the public appointed by the Governor.
(b) Vacancies. – Any vacancies on the Board shall be filled by the appointing authority
as provided in subsection (a) of this section, except that any vacancy in appointments by the
General Assembly shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 120-122. Individuals appointed to fill
vacancies shall serve until the normal expiration of the term they were appointed to fill.
(c) Qualifications. –
(1) All members appointed to the Board shall be citizens of the United States and
residents of the State of North Carolina.
(2) All members appointed to the Board, except for the physicians appointed by
the Governor under subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section and the
public member appointed by the Governor under subdivision (6) of subsection
(a) of this section, shall be required to hold a North Carolina Integrative
Therapies License in their respective profession and remain in good standing
for the duration of their terms.
(3) Public members of the Board shall not be:
a. An agent or employee trained or experienced in the practice of
integrative therapies.
b. An agent or employee of a person engaged in the practice of
integrative therapies.
c. A spouse of an individual licensed pursuant to this Article.
d. Any person with significant financial interest in a health service or
profession.
(d) New Integrative Therapies Professions. – Any integrative therapies professions
created after July 1, 2026, shall have two members on the Board, both of whom shall serve
three-year terms. One of these members shall be appointed by the Governor. The second member
shall be appointed by the General Assembly. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
make a recommendation to be approved by the General Assembly for the first term, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall make a recommendation to be approved by the General
Assembly for the second term. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate shall thereafter alternate recommendations for subsequent terms.
(e) Removal. – The Board may remove any of its members for neglect of duty,
incompetence, or unprofessional conduct. A member subject to disciplinary proceedings as a
licensed integrative therapies professional shall be disqualified from participating in the official
business of the Board until the charges have been resolved. Any member of the Board may be
removed from office by the Governor for good cause shown.
(f) Compensation of Members; Meetings. – A Board member may not receive
compensation but may receive reimbursement as provided in G.S. 93B-5. The officers of the
Board shall include a chair, a secretary, and any other officers deemed necessary by the Board to
carry out the purposes of this Article. All officers shall be elected annually by the Board at its
Page 2 House Bill 122-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
first meeting held after appointments to the Board are made. The Board shall hold a meeting
within 45 days after the appointment of new Board members. All officers shall serve one-year
terms and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. No person shall chair the
Board for more than five consecutive years. The Board may adopt rules governing the calling,
holding, and conducting of regular and special meetings. A majority of Board members present
and voting constitutes a quorum, and no action may be taken without a quorum.
"§ 90-750.4. Powers of the Board.
The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Administer, coordinate, and enforce the provisions of this Article.
(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules necessary to conduct its business, carry out its
duties, and administer this Article.
(3) Appoint and maintain advisory committees to fulfill the daily regulation of
integrative therapies professions.
(4) Issue, renew, deny, suspend, or revoke Integrative Therapies Licenses, order
probation, issue reprimands, and conduct any disciplinary actions authorized
by this Article.
(5) Authorize expenditures deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this
Article from fees paid to the Board pursuant to this Article.
(6) Remit to advisory committees funds sufficient for those advisory committees
to carry out their duties.
(7) Conduct investigations for the purpose of discovering violations of this Article
or grounds for disciplinary actions.
(8) Conduct any administrative hearings necessary for the administration of this
Article, including disciplinary hearings to enforce the provisions of this
Article.
(9) Establish fees as necessary for the administration of this Article.
"§ 90-750.5. Expenses and fees.
(a) All fees shall be payable to and deposited in the name of the Board in financial
institutions designated by the Board as official depositories. These fees shall be used to carry out
the purposes of this Article.
(b) All salaries, compensation, and expenses incurred or allowed to carry out the purposes
of this Article shall be paid by the Board exclusively out of the fees received by the Board as
authorized by this Article or funds received from other sources. In no case shall any salary,
expense, or other obligation authorized by this Article be charged against the State treasury.
(c) The Board shall establish fees for integrative therapies professions not exceeding the
following amounts:
(1) Issuance of a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License ............. $300.00
(2) License application and examination ................................................. $200.00
(3) North Carolina Integrative Therapies License renewal (annually) .... $350.00
(4) Late renewal ....................................................................................... $200.00.
"§ 90-750.6. Violations.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person violating any
provision of this Article shall be punished as follows:
(1) For the first violation, the individual shall receive a written warning.
(2) For the second violation, the individual shall be subject to a civil penalty of
no more than two hundred dollars ($200.00).
(3) For the third and each subsequent violation, the individual shall be subject to
a civil penalty of no more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each
violation and shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
(b) The clear proceeds of a civil penalty assessed under this section shall be remitted to
the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
House Bill 122-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 90-750.7. Injunction.
As an additional remedy, the Board may proceed in superior court to enjoin and restrain any
person from violating the prohibitions of this Article. The Board shall not be required to post
bond when seeking an injunction pursuant to this section.
"§ 90-750.8. Integrative therapies professions.
The following are the integrative therapies professions subject to this Article:
(1) Art therapists.
(2) Music therapists.
"§ 90-750.9. Third-party reimbursement.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require direct third-party reimbursement to
persons licensed under this Article.
"Part 2. Art Therapy.
"§ 90-750.10. Art therapy as an integrative therapy profession.
It is the policy of this State that the practice of art therapy shall be considered an integrative
therapy profession.
"§ 90-750.11. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Art therapy. – A therapeutic profession that enriches the lives of individuals,
families, and communities through active art-making, creative process,
applied psychological theory, and human experience within a therapeutic
relationship with the goal of restoring a client's functioning or sense of
personal well-being.
(2) Certifying entity. – The Art Therapy Credentials Board or its successor.
(3) Committee. – The North Carolina Art Therapy Advisory Committee.
(4) National certification. – A determination by the certifying entity that an
individual has passed the certifying entity's national exam and that the
individual has an active status with the certifying entity.
(5) North Carolina Licensed Art Therapist. – An individual that (i) is registered
by the certifying entity as a registered art therapist and (ii) has been issued a
North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy by the Board.
"§ 90-750.12. North Carolina Art Therapy Advisory Committee.
(a) Establishment. – The North Carolina Art Therapy Advisory Committee is created.
The Committee consists of three members serving staggered terms. The initial Committee
members shall be appointed on or before January 1, 2027, as follows:
(1) The Board shall appoint from a list of names submitted by the North Carolina
Art Therapy Association or its successor two art therapists eligible for
licensure under this Article. One member shall serve an initial term of three
years, and one member shall serve an initial term of two years.
(2) The Board shall appoint one public member who shall serve an initial term of
one year.
Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial Committee members, each subsequent member
shall be appointed for a term of three years. The term of a member shall begin on January 1 of
each year. A member shall serve until the member's successor is appointed. No member shall
serve on the Committee for more than two consecutive full terms.
(b) Qualifications. – The initial art therapist appointees shall be citizens of the United
States and North Carolina residents for at least two years prior to appointment, certified by the
certifying entity as an art therapist, and eligible to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies
License in art therapy under G.S. 90-750.14. Upon appointment, each initial art therapist
appointee shall immediately seek to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art
therapy under this Article and shall remain in good standing with the Committee during the
appointee's term. Subsequent art therapy appointees shall be citizens of the United States,
Page 4 House Bill 122-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
residents of North Carolina, North Carolina Licensed Art Therapists, and appointed by the Board
from a list of names supplied by the North Carolina Art Therapy Association or its successor.
Public members of the Committee shall not be:
(1) An agent or employee trained or experienced in the practice of art therapy.
(2) An agent or employee of a person engaged in the practice of art therapy.
(3) A member of an integrative therapies profession or a person enrolled in a
program to become a member of an integrative therapies profession.
(4) A spouse of an individual licensed under this Article.
(5) Any person with significant financial interest in a health service or profession.
(c) Meetings. – The Committee shall elect annually a chair and other officers as it deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Committee may hold additional meetings
upon the call of the chair or any two Committee members. A majority of the Committee shall
constitute a quorum.
(d) Compensation of Members; Expenses; Employees. – Members of the Committee
shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive per diem and necessary travel
and subsistence expenses as provided in G.S. 138-5 and G.S. 138-6. In no event shall the State
of North Carolina be liable for expenses incurred by the Committee in excess of the income
derived from this Article.
"§ 90-750.13. Powers and duties of Committee.
The Committee shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Administer and coordinate the provisions of this Part.
(2) Make recommendations to the Board to adopt, amend, or repeal rules to
administer and enforce this Part.
(3) Establish and determine qualification and fitness of applicants for a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy under this Part.
(4) Make recommendations to the Board to issue, renew, deny, suspend, revoke,
or refuse to issue or renew a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in
art therapy under this Article.
(5) Make recommendations to the Board to discipline North Carolina Licensed
Art Therapists.
(6) Advise the Board to seek civil and criminal penalties against unlicensed
individuals engaged in the practice of art therapy.
(7) Provide all North Carolina Licensed Art Therapists with a wallet-sized card
identifying the bearer as a North Carolina Licensed Art Therapist.
(8) Maintain a list of all individuals in the State who hold a North Carolina
Integrative Therapies License in art therapy.
"§ 90-750.14. Integrative therapy licensure in art therapy application and requirements.
Each individual desiring to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art
therapy under this Article shall apply to the Committee in accordance with the procedures and
rules prescribed by the Board. The Committee shall recommend that the Board issue a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy to any applicant who furnishes evidence
satisfactory to the Committee that the applicant meets all of the following criteria:
(1) The applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(2) The applicant is of good moral character as determined by the Committee.
(3) The applicant holds a national certification issued by the certifying entity.
(4) The applicant has paid all applicable fees to the Board as specified in
G.S. 90-750.5.
"§ 90-750.15. License renewal.
Every North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy issued by the Board shall
be renewed annually on a date established by rule. The Committee shall recommend that the
Board renew the North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy of any individual
House Bill 122-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
who files a renewal application with the Committee and who meets the criteria set forth in
G.S. 90-750.14.
"§ 90-750.16. Compensation for art therapy services; prohibited acts.
Compensation may be received for art therapy services only when those services are
performed by an individual holding a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy.
Nonlicensed individuals who provide art therapy services or who engage in the practice of art
therapy are subject to the penalties in G.S. 90-750.6 or an injunction under G.S. 90-750.7 unless
the individual is an art therapy student working to obtain a certification of completion from a
nationally recognized art therapy education program.
"§ 90-750.17. License to be displayed; advertising.
(a) At all places of business in which compensated art therapy services are offered, a
valid and up-to-date license for all individuals offering compensated art therapy services shall be
displayed in a prominent place.
(b) All public advertising designed to attract clients for art therapy services shall identify
that the services will be performed by an individual holding a North Carolina Integrative
Therapies License in art therapy.
(c) No individual shall use the title "North Carolina Licensed Art Therapist" unless that
individual holds a valid North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy issued by the
Board. Individuals holding themselves out as North Carolina Licensed Art Therapists shall carry
the identification card described in G.S. 90-750.13(7) at all times when providing art therapy
services. Individuals in violation of this subsection are subject to the penalties in G.S. 90-750.6
or an injunction under G.S. 90-750.7.
"§ 90-750.18. Reciprocity.
The Committee may recommend that the Board grant, upon application and payment of
proper fees, a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy to a person who has
been licensed or certified to practice art therapy in another state or territory of the United States
whose standards of competency are substantially equivalent to the requirements for licensure
provided in this Article.
"Part 3. Music Therapy.
"§ 90-750.20. Music therapy as an integrative therapies profession.
It is the policy of this State that the practice of music therapy shall be considered an
integrative therapies profession.
"§ 90-750.21. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Certifying entity. – The Certification Board for Music Therapists or its
successor.
(2) Committee. – The North Carolina Music Therapy Advisory Committee.
(3) Music therapy. – The clinical and evidence-based use of music interventions
to accomplish individualized goals for people of all ages and ability levels
within a therapeutic relationship by a credentialed professional who has
completed an approved music therapy program, including (i) assessment of a
client's emotional, physical, and spiritual health; social functioning;
communication abilities; and cognitive skills through the client's history and
observation and interaction of the client in music and nonmusic settings, (ii)
development and implementation of treatment plans, based on a client's
assessed needs, using music interventions, including music improvisation,
receptive music listening, song writing, lyric discussion, music and imagery,
singing, music performance, learning through music, music combined with
other arts, music-assisted relaxation, music-based patient education,
electronic music technology, adapted music intervention, and movement to
Page 6 House Bill 122-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
music, and (iii) evaluation and documentation of the client's response to
treatment.
(4) Music therapy services. – The provision of services to accomplish music
therapy goals, including (i) conducting an individualized assessment for the
purpose of collecting systematic, comprehensive, and accurate data necessary
to determine the course of action subsequent to the individualized treatment
plan, (ii) planning and developing the individualized music therapy treatment
plan that identifies an individual's goals, objectives, and potential treatment
intervention strategies, (iii) implementing the individualized music therapy
treatment plan consistent with the individual's overall treatment program, (iv)
systematically evaluating and comparing the individual's response to the
individualized music therapy treatment plan, documenting progress, and
suggesting modifications, as appropriate, (v) developing a discharge plan in
collaboration with the individual, the individual's family, treatment team, and
other identified support networks, when appropriate, (vi) minimizing the
impact of environmental constraints as a barrier to participation in least
restrictive environments for individuals engaging in music therapy, (vii)
collaborating with and educating the individual, family, caregiver, and others
to foster an environment responsive to the developmental needs of the
individual as addressed in music therapy, and (viii) consulting with groups,
programs, organizations, or communities to improve accessibility to music
therapy services.
(5) National certification. – A determination by the certifying entity that an
individual has satisfied the certifying entity's requirements and that the
individual has an active status with the certifying entity.
(6) North Carolina Licensed Music Therapist. – An individual who has been
issued a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy by the
Board.
"§ 90-750.22. North Carolina Music Therapy Advisory Committee.
(a) Establishment. – The North Carolina Music Therapy Advisory Committee is created.
The Committee consists of three members serving staggered terms. The initial Committee
members shall be appointed on or before January 1, 2027, as follows:
(1) The Board shall appoint from a list of names submitted by the Music Therapy
Association of North Carolina or its successor two music therapists eligible to
obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy under
this Article. One member shall serve an initial term of three years, and one
member shall serve an initial term of two years.
(2) The Board shall appoint one public member who shall serve an initial term of
one year.
Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial Committee members, each subsequent member
shall be appointed for a term of three years. The term of a member shall begin on January 1 of
each year. A member shall serve until the member's successor is appointed. No member shall
serve on the Committee for more than two consecutive full terms.
(b) Qualifications. – The initial music therapist appointees shall be citizens of the United
States and North Carolina residents for at least two years prior to appointment, certified by the
certifying entity as a music therapist, and eligible to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies
License in music therapy under G.S. 90-750.24. Upon appointment, each initial music therapist
appointee shall immediately seek to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in
music therapy under this Article and shall remain in good standing with the Committee during
the appointee's term. Subsequent music therapist appointees shall be citizens of the United States,
residents of North Carolina, North Carolina Licensed Music Therapists, and appointed by the
House Bill 122-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Board from a list of names supplied by the Music Therapy Association of North Carolina or its
successor. Public members of the Committee shall not be:
(1) An agent or employee trained or experienced in the practice of music therapy.
(2) An agent or employee of a person engaged in the practice of music therapy.
(3) A member of an integrative therapies profession or a person enrolled in a
program to become a member of an integrative therapies profession.
(4) A spouse of an individual licensed under this Article.
(5) Any person with significant financial interest in a health service or profession.
(c) Meetings. – The Committee shall elect annually a chair and other officers as it deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Committee may hold additional meetings
upon the call of the chair or any two Committee members. A majority of the Committee shall
constitute a quorum.
(d) Compensation of Members; Expenses; Employees. – Members of the Committee
shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive per diem and necessary travel
and subsistence expenses as provided in G.S. 138-5 and G.S. 138-6. In no event shall the State
of North Carolina be liable for expenses incurred by the Committee in excess of the income
derived from this Article.
"§ 90-750.23. Powers and duties of Committee.
The Committee shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Administer and coordinate the provisions of this Part.
(2) Make recommendations to the Board to adopt, amend, or repeal rules to
administer and enforce this Part.
(3) Establish and determine qualification and fitness of applicants for a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy under this Part.
(4) Make recommendations to the Board to issue, renew, deny, suspend, revoke,
or refuse to issue or renew a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in
music therapy under this Article.
(5) Make recommendations to the Board to discipline North Carolina Licensed
Music Therapists.
(6) Advise the Board to seek civil and criminal penalties against nonlicensed
individuals engaged in the practice of music therapy.
(7) Provide all North Carolina Licensed Music Therapists with a wallet-sized card
identifying the bearer as a North Carolina Licensed Music Therapist.
(8) Maintain a list of all individuals in the State who hold a North Carolina
Integrative Therapies License in music therapy.
"§ 90-750.24. North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy
requirements.
Each individual desiring to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music
therapy under this Article shall apply to the Committee in accordance with the procedures and
rules prescribed by the Board. The Committee shall recommend that the Board issue a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy to any applicant who furnishes evidence
satisfactory to the Committee that the applicant meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Is 18 years of age or older.
(2) Is of good moral character as determined by the Committee.
(3) Provides proof of one of the following:
a. Passing the examination for board certification offered by the
Certification Board for Music Therapists or its successor
organizations.
b. Being transitioned into board certification by the Certification Board
for Music Therapists or its successor organizations and currently
holding the MT-BC credential as a board-certified music therapist.
Page 8 House Bill 122-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Has paid all applicable fees to the Board as specified under G.S. 90-750.5.
"§ 90-750.25. License renewal.
Every North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy issued by the Board
shall be renewed annually on a date established by rule. The Committee shall recommend that
the Board renew the license of any individual who files a renewal application with the Committee
and who meets the licensure criteria set forth in G.S. 90-750.24.
"§ 90-750.26. Compensation for music therapy services; prohibited acts.
Compensation may be received for music therapy services only when those services are
performed by an individual holding a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music
therapy. Nonlicensed individuals who provide music therapy services or who engage in the
practice of music therapy are subject to the penalties in G.S. 90-750.6 or an injunction under
G.S. 90-750.7.
"§ 90-750.27. North Carolina Licensed Music Therapist.
(a) No individual without a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music
therapy shall use the title "music therapist," "licensed professional music therapist," or similar
title or practice music therapy.
(b) Nothing in this Chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict the practice, services,
or activities of the following:
(1) Any individual licensed, certified, or regulated under the laws of this State in
another profession or occupation, including physicians, psychologists,
psychoanalysts, registered nurses, marriage and family therapists, social
workers, occupational therapists, professional or rehabilitation counselors,
speech-language pathologists or audiologists, or personnel supervised by a
licensed professional, performing work, including the use of music, incidental
to the practice of his or her licensed, certified, or regulated profession or
occupation, if that person does not represent himself or herself as a music
therapist.
(2) Any individual whose training and national certification attests to the
individual's preparation and ability to practice his or her certified profession
or occupation, if that person does not represent himself or herself as a music
therapist.
(3) Any practice of music therapy as an integral part of a program of study for
students enrolled in an accredited music therapy program, if the student does
not represent himself or herself as a music therapist.
(c) An individual who is not a licensed professional music therapist may provide music
therapy under the supervision of a licensed professional music therapist for a period not to exceed
180 days from the start of practice if the individual's application to obtain board certification is
pending and the individual meets the remaining requirements for a North Carolina Integrative
Therapies License in music therapy listed in G.S. 90-750.24.
"§ 90-750.28. Reciprocity.
The Committee may recommend that the Board grant, upon application and payment of
proper fees, a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy to a person who has
been licensed or certified to practice music therapy in another state or territory of the United
States whose standards of competency are substantially equivalent to the requirements for
licensure provided in this Article.
"§ 90-750.29. Collaboration.
(a) Before an individual with a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music
therapy provides music therapy services to a client for an identified clinical or developmental
need, the individual shall review the client's diagnosis, treatment needs, and treatment plan with
the health care providers involved in the client's care. Before an individual with a North Carolina
Integrative Therapies License in music therapy provides music therapy services to a student for
House Bill 122-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
an identified educational need in a special education setting, the individual shall review with the
individualized family service plan or individualized education program team the student's
diagnosis, treatment needs, and treatment plan.
(b) During the provision of music therapy services to a client, an individual with a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy shall collaborate, as applicable, with the
client's treatment team, including the client's physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social
worker, or other mental health professional. During the provision of music therapy services to a
client with a communication disorder, an individual with a North Carolina Integrative Therapies
License in music therapy shall collaborate and discuss the music therapy treatment plan with the
client's audiologist or speech-language pathologist so that the music therapist may work with the
client and address communication skills.
(c) When providing educational or health care services, an individual with a North
Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy may not replace the services provided
by an audiologist or a speech-language pathologist. Unless authorized to practice
speech-language pathology, music therapists may not evaluate, examine, instruct, or counsel on
speech, language, communication, and swallowing disorders and conditions. An individual with
a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy may not represent to the public
that the individual is authorized to treat a communication disorder. This does not prohibit an
individual with a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in music therapy from
representing to the public that the individual may work with clients who have a communication
disorder and address communication skills."
SECTION 2.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 90-750.3, as enacted by Section 1 of this act,
the initial members of the North Carolina Board of Integrative Therapies shall be appointed as
follows:
(1) The General Assembly, upon the recommendation of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, shall appoint one art therapist to serve an initial term
of three years.
(2) The General Assembly, upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, shall appoint one music therapist to serve an initial term
of two years.
(3) The Governor shall appoint one art therapist to serve an initial term of two
years.
(4) The Governor shall appoint one music therapist to serve an initial term of three
years.
(5) The Governor shall appoint one physician to serve an initial term of two years
and one physician to serve an initial term of one year.
(6) The Governor shall appoint one member of the public who shall serve an
initial term of three years.
SECTION 2.(b) The art therapists appointed to the Board pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section shall have been North Carolina residents for at least two years prior to
appointment, certified by a national entity that certifies art therapists, and eligible for licensure
under G.S. 90-750.14, as enacted by Section 1 of this act. Upon appointment, the art therapist
appointees shall seek to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in art therapy as
soon as the first application period begins and shall remain in good standing with the Board.
SECTION 2.(c) The music therapists appointed to the Board pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section shall have been North Carolina residents for at least two years prior to
appointment, certified by a national entity that certifies music therapists, and eligible for licensure
under G.S. 90-750.24, as enacted pursuant to Section 1 of this act. Upon appointment, the initial
music therapist appointees shall seek to obtain a North Carolina Integrative Therapies License in
music therapy as soon as the first application period begins and shall remain in good standing
with the Board.
Page 10 House Bill 122-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(d) The appointments required by this section shall be made on or
before December 1, 2026, and the initial terms of the appointees shall begin on January 1, 2027.
Once these initial terms expire, all vacancies shall be filled according to the provisions of
G.S. 90-750.3, as enacted in Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 90-750.6, 90-750.7, 90-750.16, 90-750.17, 90-750.26, and
90-750.27, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, become effective on the date that is the first day
of a month that begins 180 days after the chair of the North Carolina Board of Integrative
Therapies certifies to the Revisor of Statutes that the Board has begun accepting applications for
Integrative Therapies Licenses and apply to acts committed on or after that date. This section and
the remainder of Section 1 of this act are effective when they become law.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 122-Second Edition Page 11